Utah statutes.
72-7-304.   Injury to trees on highways -- Penalty for violations.
(1)  A person may not dig up, cut down, or otherwise willfully damage or
destroy any shade, ornamental, or other tree, planted and standing on any
public highway in conformity to law.
(2)  A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor and
is liable to the owner of the tree for treble the amount of damages sustained.
